Hawaii statutes.
§144-7 Misbranding. No person shall
distribute or import misbranded feed. A commercial, toll-milled, or
custom-mixed feed shall be deemed to be misbranded:

(1) If its labeling is false or misleading in any
particular.

(2) If it is distributed under the name of another
feed.

(3) If it is not labeled as required in section 144-4
and in rules prescribed under this chapter.

(4) If it purports to be or is represented as a
commercial feed, or if it purports to contain or is represented as containing a
feed ingredient, unless such commercial feed or feed ingredient conforms to the
definition of identity, if any, prescribed by rules of the department. In the
adoption of such rules the department shall give due regard to commonly
accepted definitions such as those issued by the Association of American Feed
Control Officials.

(5) If any word, statement, or other information
required by or under authority of this chapter to appear on the label or
labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness (as
compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling)
and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the
ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use. [L 1959, c
275, pt of §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §24-8;
HRS §144-8; am L 1979, c 186, pt of §1; am and ren L 1983, c 214, pt of §2]

Revision Note

Section
"144-4" substituted for "144-5".

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next